Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-412.04
Criminal and civil trials; agreements for change of venue; jury; selection.

The jury for any case to be tried pursuant to an agreement entered into under section 25-412.03 shall be selected from the county in which the case was first filed. The jury shall be selected in the manner prescribed in the Jury Selection Act. The summons shall direct attendance before the court by which the case is to be tried and the return thereof shall be made to the same court.

Laws 1975, LB 97, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-904;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 36.